hr-HR: Kompatibilni programski jezici: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместими езици за програмиране: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Други
th: ภาษาโปรแกรมที่รองรับ: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; เหล็กป้องกันสนิม; SQL; Scala; เปลือก; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; อื่นๆ
fr: Langage de programmation compatible: Bash; C; Mi dièse; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Rubis; Rouille; SQL; Scala; Coquille; Rapide; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Autre
sv: Kompatibla programmeringsspråk: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Gå; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Rubin; Rost; SQL; Scala; Skal; Snabb; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Annat
sl-SI: Združljivi programski jeziki: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Drugo
ro-RO: Limbaje de programare compatibile: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Altele
zh-CN: 适用编程语言: Bash; C; C 升号; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; 生锈; SQL; Scala; 壳; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; 其他
tr: Uyumlu Programlama Dilleri: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Pas; SQL; Scala; Kabuk; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Diğer
ja: 互換性のあるプログラミング言語: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; 錆; SQL; Scala; シェル; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; その他
ko: 호환 가능한 프로그래밍 언어: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; 파이썬; R; Ruby; 녹; SQL; Scala; 껍데기; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; 기타
nl: Compatibele programmeertalen: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Roest; SQL; Scala; Schelp; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Andere
sk-SK: Kompatibilné programovacie jazyky: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Iné
el: Συμβατές γλώσσες προγραμματισμού: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Άλλο
es: Lenguajes de programación compatibles: Bash; C; Do#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Óxido; SQL; Scala; Concha; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Otros
nb: Kompatible programmeringsspråk: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Skjell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Annen
pt-PT: Linguagens de programação compatíveis: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Ferrugem; SQL; Scala; Concha; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Outro
pl: Zgodne języki programowania: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rdza; SQL; Scala; Skorupa; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Linguagens de programação compatíveis: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Concha; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Outro
vi: Ngôn ngữ lập trình tương thích: Ngôn ngữ lệnh Bash; C; C#; C++; Nền tảng phần mềm Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Ngôn ngữ lập trình Kotlin; Nền tảng nguồn mở Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Ngôn ngữ Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Gỉ; SQL; Scala; Vỏ; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Khác
hu: Kompatibilis programnyelvek: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Egyéb
de: Kompatible Programmiersprachen: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; JavaScript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rost; SQL; Scala; Muschelschale; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Sonstiges
en: Compatible programming languages: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Other
fi: Yhteensopivat ohjelmointikielet: Tälli; C; Cis; C++; Ahtaaja; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Ruoste; SQL; Scala; Kuori; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Muu
it: Linguaggi di programmazione compatibili: Bash; C; Do diesis; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Conchiglia; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Altro
da: Kompatible programmeringssprog: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Skal; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Andet
zh-TW: 相容程式語言: Bash; C; 升 C 調; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; 殼; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamos programavimo kalbos: „Bash“; C; C#; C++; „Docker“; „Go“; „Java“; „Javascript“; „Kotlin“; „Kubernetes“; „Node.js“; PHP; „Perl“; „PyTorch“; „Python“; R; „Ruby“; „Rust“; SQL; „Scala“; „Shell“; „Swift“; „TensorFlow“; „TypeScript“; Kita
ru: Совместимые языки программирования: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rust; SQL; Scala; Shell; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Другое
cs: Kompatibilní programovací jazyky: Bash; C; C#; C++; Docker; Go; Java; Javascript; Kotlin; Kubernetes; Node.js; PHP; Perl; PyTorch; Python; R; Ruby; Rez; SQL; Scala; Skořápky; Swift; TensorFlow; TypeScript; Jiné